Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 28
MORTGAGE COMPANIES

Sec.

§ 26-2801. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2801, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2802. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2802, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600; am. 2007, ch. 126, § 7, p. 376.

§ 26-2803. Exemptions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2803, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2804. Unlawful acts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2804, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2805. Powers and duties of director. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2805, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600; am. 1993, ch. 216, § 13, p. 587.

§ 26-2806. Remedies available to the department. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2806, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2807. Reserve accounts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2807, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2808. Annual statements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2808, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2809. Notice of transfer. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2809, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2810. Complaints. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2810, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.

§ 26-2811. Severability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2811, as added by 1990, ch. 225, § 1, p. 600.